Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-414
Educational courses and standards; Tax Commissioner; duties.

The Property Tax Administrator shall:

(1) Establish, implement, and maintain a required system of educational courses for the certification and recertification of all holders of county assessor certificates; and

(2) Establish the required educational standards and criteria for certification and recertification of all holders of county assessor certificates.

In order to promote compliance with the requirements of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate, and from time to time amend or revise, rules and regulations containing the necessary educational standards and criteria for certification and recertification.

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 443, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 28.